District of Columbia statutes.
29-101.05

Rules and procedures.

The Mayor may adopt rules in accordance with the subchapter I of Chapter 5 and may prescribe procedures not required to be adopted as rules which are reasonably necessary to perform the duties required of the Mayor under this title.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720